morph-phon-yavuz.xfst
!
! This file only contains a set of useful definitions. This is sourced
! from the other scripts that generate useful automata.
!

!
! Define some useful character classes
!

! Vowels
define Vf   e | i | ö | ü | E | İ | Ö | Ü | î | Î | %^sFRV | %^sFUV;
define Vb   a | ı | o | u | A | I | O | U | â | Â | û | Û | %^sBRV | %^sBUV;
define Vh   i | ü | ı | u | İ | Ü | I | U | î | Î | û | Û | %^si | %^sü | %^sı | %^su;
define Vl   e | ö | a | o | E | Ö | A | O | â | Â | %^se | %^sö | %^sa | %^so;
define Vfr  ö | ü | Ö | Ü | %^sFRV;
define Vfu  e | i | E | İ | î | Î | %^sFUV;
define Vbr  o | u | O | U | û | Û | %^sBRV;
define Vbu  a | ı | A | I | â | Â | %^sBUV;
define Vowel  Vf | Vb;
define Vbuf %^%(I%) | %^%(A%);
define Vpal %^pA | %^pI | %^pO | %^pU | %^pÂ | %^pÎ | %^pÔ |%^pÛ;
define Vxx  %^A | %^I ;
define Vsilent %^sFRV | %^sFUV | %^sBRV | %^sBUV ; 
define Vall Vowel | Vxx | Vpal | Vsilent; ! except buffer vowels

! Consonants
define ConsV b | d | c | g | v | z | j | f | ğ | l | m | n | r | w | y | 
           B | D | C | G | V | Z | J | F | Ğ | L | M | N | R | W | Y | %^sVC;
define ConsUV p | t | ç | k | f | s | ş | h | 
            P | T | Ç | K | F | S | Ş | H | %^sUC;
define Cons  ConsV | ConsUV;
define ConsBuf %^%(y%) | %^%(s%) | %^%(ş%) | %^%(n%);
define ConsXX    %^c | %^p | %^t | %^k | %^g | %^K | %^D | %^C | %@LN ;
define ConsSilent %^sVC |  %^sUC;
define ConsAll  Cons | ConsXX |ConsSilent; ! except buffers

! Intermediate symbols with no surface forms
define Boundary %@MB | %@RB | %@dB ;
define IntSym   Boundary | %@M | %@MREDUP | %@NCOMP | %@opt3 | %^NS | %^NNS;

!
! Buffer deletion
!

define NonBufCons [Cons | ConsXX ];
define DelBufCons [ConsBuf -> 0 || [Cons | ConsXX] [IntSym]* _ ]
                  .o. [ %^%(y%) -> y,, 
                        %^%(s%) -> s,,
                        %^%(ş%) -> ş,,
                        %^%(n%) -> n 
                      ];

define DelBufVow [Vbuf -> 0 || [Vowel | Vxx ] [IntSym]* _ ] 
             .o. [ %^%(I%) -> %^I ,,
                   %^%(A%) -> %^A ] ;

define DeleteBuffer DelBufCons .o. DelBufVow ;

!
! Vowel Harmony
!
! We also delete `palatalized' vowels at the end since they are
! only used for vowel harmony.
!

define DelPV %^pA -> a , %^pI -> ı, %^pO -> o, %^pU -> u , 
             %^pÂ -> â , %^pÎ -> î, %^pÔ -> ô, %^pÛ -> û;

define VowelHarmony [ %^I -> ı  //  Vbu          \Vall* _  ,,
                      %^I -> u  //  Vbr          \Vall* _  ,,
                      %^I -> ü  //  [Vfr | %^pO | %^pU] \Vall* _  ,,
                      %^I -> i  //  [Vfu | %^pA | %^pI] \Vall* _  ,,
                      %^A -> a  //  Vb           \Vall* _  ,,
                      %^A -> e  //  [Vf | Vpal]  \Vall* _  ]
               .o. [ %^A -> e , %^I -> i ] ! defaults
               .o. DelPV;

!
! Final stop devoicing
!
!
! NOTE: reduplication should be done after this one.
!

define FSDevoicing  [%^c -> c,
                     %^g -> ğ,
                     %^K (->) ğ,
                     %^K -> y,
                     %^p -> b,
                     %^t -> d ||    _ IntSym* [ Vowel | Vxx ]  ]
                .o.  %^k -> ğ || \n _ IntSym* [ Vowel | Vxx ]
                .o.  %^k -> g || n  _ IntSym* [ Vowel | Vxx ]
                .o. [%^c -> ç,
                     %^g -> g,
                     %^K -> k,
                     %^p -> p,
                     %^t -> t,
                     %^k -> k];


!
! Filter for cleaning up the intermediate symbols in the analysis level
! we also deal with adding -sI to compound noun roots, since we use a
! special notation in lexicon and leave the -(s)I out in lexical entries.
! 
!

!
! move the prefix percent after the number.
! this feels more readable witho right-arrow rules.
! we'll use the inverse of it
!
define percfilter [ [..] -> {<perc>} || .#. 
                                      {<perc>}  
                                      [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%.|%,]+
                                      {<Num} \">"* %> _ ]
                  .o. {<perc>} -> 0 || .#. _ ;


define AFilter    FSDevoicing.i 
              .o. VowelHarmony.i 
              .o. DeleteBuffer.i
              .o. %^%(s%) %^I  <- %@NCOMP
              .o. 0 <- %@DEL%@ 
              .o. 0 <- %@DELS%@ 
              .o. 0 <- %@DUP%@
              .o. 0 <- ˈ
              .o. 0 <- %@dB
              .o. 0 <- (ConsSilent|Vsilent)
              .o. percfilter.i
            ! Disallow derivational suffix -sI with stems ending with a vowel
              .o. ~[?*] <- Vall {<N><si>} 
              ;

! A few analysis symbols may result from different surface forms.
! In the morphological description, we keep theme saparate so that
! they can be distinguished when needed. However, we do not want them
! as different symbols in normal analysis strings, so we collapse them
! here.
! 
define collapseAsymbols %: %0          -> 0 || %< p 3 p _ %>
                    .o. %: %0          -> 0 || %< 3 p _ %>
                    .o. %: %0          -> 0 || %< 3 s _ %>
                    ;

define DeleteBoundary ["@MB" | "@RB"] -> 0 ;
